hunspell/cy/cy.dic
dyfrhaenau/NT
wyddiau'n/M
ceinachod/LT
yfflyn/H
arweinlyfrau'n/P
calededd/LT
orweddiog/HM
pleserlong/LT
ocsidiedig/H
ailrestra/ANPQ
toes/LT
wirionedda/AMNQ
ellyn/H
cellol/LT
cadwraethau/LNT
orlifannau'r/M
academi'n/P
alerid/MP
astudwyr/HP
gairbrosesydd/TV
toll/LT
asidedd/HP
cyrn/LT
Wernogle/M
cowperiaid/LT
ydau/HM
oslefau/HM
truanes/LT
atchwelyda/ANPQ
preblenych/L
organydd/HV
wniadau'r/M
cyfresol/LT
ymddangosiadol/H
tincielid/L
allyrrydd/HP
clustiog/LT
wyrdroadol/HM
aflonyddiadau/HP
cymynwragedd/LT
tirfasau/LNT
wingiadau'r/M
adweithiau/HP
atchweliadau/HP
cysgodluniau/LNT
goramcangyfrifon/T
oleuol/HM
albau'r/P
ellesgen/HM
wladoliad/HM
cilfae/LNT
cenhadaf/L
ewynnol/HM
ameba/HP
gwlanenwyr/T
weirynnau/HM
costreler/L
warcheidwaid/HM
ailarwydda/ANPQ
pruddglwyfus/LT
edmygwyr/H
trefnwr/LT
afaelais/M
palindrom/LT
wagnodau'n/M
allweddeiriau/HP
corbysen/LT
cyfraneddau/LNT
agregiad/HP
ellast/HM
cennad/LT
preliwdiau/LNT
adenwau'n/P
anghwrtais/HP
wyar/HM
corachedd/LT
cawen/LT
amharych/P
wrthgyferbyniadau/HM
werddyr/HM
canolfanynnau/LNT
cablen/LT
cildroadedd/LT
afaelfach/HM
olchbrennau/HM
anhyboen/HP
crwnodau/LNT
eodimedrau'r/M
propaganda/LNT
werthfarnau/HM
eirlyfr/HM
bratiog/T
Ariad/P
cwtenych/L
eneufor/HMR
weisgennau/HM
dargyfeiredd/T
cymriw/LNT
wrachïaidd/HM
bugeila/NQT
arbennig/HP
archdderwyddesau'r/P
arian/HMP
cylchglipiau/LNT
pen-blwydd/LT
offerynnwr/H
olchadwy'r/M
animeiddiad/HP
gwynfyd/T
prennaidd/LT
alwedydd/HMV
isbwysedd/H
gyriadau/NT
wefrau'r/M
paradwysau/LNT
allyryddion/HP
englo/HM
wŷl/M
pinocytosis/LT
porthcwlisiau/LNT
cyllidebu/LNQT
arterïau/HP
anadnewyddadwy'n/P
wrthgorffyn/HM
croesgydymffurfiad/LT
breintlythyrau/NT
ymroddol/H
archebiannau'n/P
ymdaith/HM
cywasgedig/LT
cydosodfeydd/LT
au/MNP
arddwrn/HP
byrbwyll/T
wrteithiwr/HM
creciar/LT
penwan/LT
is-werth/H
wibdacl/HM
cymedrolwyr/LT
atgynhyrchiadau'r/P
wrthdysti/DMNQ
goralw/NT
angorfâu/HP
ansadrwydd/HP
warchodfilwr/HM
prioriaid/LT
trwynol/LTV
o-/M
erontoleg/HM
perianth/LT
digollediadau/NT
achwynwr/HP
waeau'n/M
wrthgyfrifiadau/HM
clewten/LT
ceisiadau/LNT
allweddbadiau'n/P
amrant/HP
welladwy/HM
bryn/T
Twynllannan/LT
athrawiaethol/HP
ailosodiadau'n/P
wylnosau'r/M
tadoga/ALNQ
coelbrennau/LNT
ailymafaelwch/P
anatomegol/HP
cydymddiddan/LT
ecosystem/H
orchymynner/M
tresmaswr/LT
adferwr/HP
tetrastylau/LNT
anwahaniaethol/HP
wydredig/HM
anactifedd/HP
pyramidiau/LNT
wefeistres/HM
pendduyn/LT
afonfarch/HP
polareiddiadau/LNT
wagonét/H
or-deimladwy/HM
tadmaethod/LT
catodig/LT
is-gadfridog/HV
argymhellodd/P
waherddi/MNQ
wrthiannau/HM
craster/LT
arddunoliadau'r/P
cymelliadol/LT
asesiad/HP
wahân/HM
trïa/LNQ
anhyglyw/HP
oddrych/HM
goruchwylydd/TV
pysgoto/LNQ
orblu/HM
anghysonair/HP
angen/HMP
trynewiadiad/LT
glawrediadau/NT
adwerthol/HP
wyddon/HMW
aergloeau/HP
trulliad/LT
ideogram/H
bantam/T
abnormaleddau'n/P
cyfeillacha/ALNQ
economegwyr/H
orfoliant/HM
anilin/HP
amrediadau'n/P
creinio/LNQT
diheurbrawf/T
waedwyr/HM
arir/HM
adfedda/ANPQ
clws/LT
cribej/LT
combács/LT
waetgoch/HM
walfâu/HM
asolydd/HP
wagfeydd/HM
perlio/LNQT
garej/T
aswiriannau'n/P
ofaniadau/HM
eirdroesem/M
Cymreiges/LT
amharchit/P
ehedfeydd/H
dyrniad/T
cylla/LNT
werthfawredd/HM
wiw/HM
amserydd/HPVW
torrau/LNT
potswyr/LT
abo/HP
ofyn/HMV
awdiogram/HP
ymennyn/H
triwantiaid/LT
afliwiog/HP
athrylithgar/HP
tsieni/LNT
amynau'r/M
triniedig/LT
ale/HP
asetabwla'r/P
wangalonnant/M
odidowgrwydd/HM
cyfarwyddlyfrau/LNT
cyrydiadau/LNT
anoda/ANPQ
wrthsoddedig/HM
Twrciaid/LT
wyryfdai'n/M
awyrgludiadau'n/P
gofod/T
amserau/HP
cawliau/LNT
trefoliad/LT
ehangfryd/H
areiniadau'r/P
wamalrwydd/HM
pardwn/LT
peilotiaid/LT
allgynhyrchion/HP
arosasech/P
gogoniannau/NT
Ceinws/LT
oleudderbynnydd/HM
warogau/HM
antiffonau/HP
trawsaceniad/LT
amlwreiciol/HP
cangelloriaeth/LT
adnabyddadwy'r/P
winwyr/HM
camddyfynnu/LNQT
eiddunol/H
clercod/LT
barette/NT
allorluniau'n/P
orfodaethau'n/M
clustdlws/LT
is-ffylwm/H
teledeip/LT
pantiog/LT
atecbost/HP
ystorfeydd/H
wythenigau/HM
cynfodoli/LNQT
ymprydiwr/H
academaidd/HP
tremofydd/LTVW
cynradd/LT
wrthbwysyn/HM
weithfaol/HM
affwysau'n/P
cwmpni/LNT
cefnlun/LT
is-ganghellor/H
anghytûn/HP
poer/LTV
elont/M
enwebiad/H
peptidau/LNT
anwag/HP
teyrnas/LRT
is-gyfrif/H
anufuddheais/P
ohiriant/HM
temenosau/LNT
anwes/HPR
tanwydredd/LT
argoelest/P
allgylch/HPR
pêl-foli/LNT
weithgynhyrchwyr/HM
allraddiadau'n/P
ymdaeniad/H
cwynfeni/LNQ
cyflasynnau/LNT
afredir/P
anianyddol/HP
eiriogrwydd/HM
penydi/DLNQ
ailgynhyrchwyd/P
ymnastwyr/HM
caethgludiad/LT
prynedigaeth/LT
wythieniadau'r/M
awstenit/HP
aswiriant/HP
canolbwynti/DLNQ
pendraphen/LT
amlsynhwyraidd/HP
asgell-dde'r/P
cronaswn/L
wysiad/HM
eiriolwyr/H
dihareb/T
adaist/MP
trawsnewidiad/LT
adict/HP
wyrdroesant/M
cunogau/LNT
adfeddiant/HP
cychaid/LT
edeulyngyr/H
camgymhelliannau/LNT
anunion/HP
wrthderi/MNQ
cryglais/LT
dyfeisiau/NT
ystranc/H
adiom/P
condrol/LT
orfanwl/HM
crisial/LTU
cnicynnau/LNT
awdiogramau'n/P
cricedwyr/LT
anudonwr/HP
wreiddlysieuyn/HM
Dylife/T
annibyniaethau/HP
cytundebau/LNT
araflais/HP
wrth-heintus/HM
arddwysedd/HP
crymanu/ALNQ
boneddigaidd/T
amrywiannau/HP
agendorau'n/MP
pair/LT
argraffdy/HP
cydweithiwr/LT
aent/MP
oruwchddinas/HMR
adeinnent/P
tanstaffio/LNQT
areithwragedd/HP
waharddau'n/M
canŵnem/L
afryw/HP
congl/LT
wenynwr/HM
argragen/HP
anhuddol/HP
Pontllogail/LT
cymylogrwydd/LT
ariannol/HP
werau'r/M
wrth-ddweud/HM
anweladwy'n/P
Coed-y-parc/LT
casin/LT
alcyleiddiad/HP
wrthgenid/M
amper/HP
blaenymenyddiau/NT
camsillefaist/L
amebas/HP
welw'r/M
unnos/H
goleufa/NT
allyrwyr/HP
corddiadau/LNT
orgyflenwadau'n/M
analogau'n/P
entasis/H
diriant/T
arofunnet/P
ceulennydd/LT
enres/HM
diwarant/T
isogamedd/H
angiosberm/HP
campus/LT
wnes/M
treiglfeydd/LT
arhosais/P
alegorïau/HP
orfûm/M
cwb/LT
camgymeriadau/LNT
arteithglwyd/HP
oblygiad/HM
trawsfeddiant/LT
ailwerthusiad/HP
adacen/HPV
profedigeion/LT
wacsaw'r/M
awyrendy'n/P
cydlyniadau/LNT
allgraig/HP
athrofeydd/HP
wrthbabau'n/M
Caerwrangon/LT
cwadratau/LNT
adnabuwyd/P
wyntyll/HM
leisiau/MN
coflaid/LT
anllygradwy/HP
pellenniff/L
ochelsid/M
undydd/H
arwynebau/HP
gymnasteg/T
aruthreddau'n/P
orffenasid/M
crychdonnai/LNQ
erotig/H
cyfeiriad/LT
aneirod/HP
orbryderus/HM
potes/LT
anghytgordiau'r/P
gwyryfdod/T
ernes/H
orffenned/M
asetalau'n/P
deustadau/NT
tirfesur/LT
atgyrchion/HP
wardiau/HM
postliwd/LT
actinomysetau/HP
tryloywaf/LT
oleusoch/M
alltaith/HP
peipio/LNQT
anghryno'r/P
partïol/LT
calico/LNT
werraist/M
anad/HP
enwadur/H
adfachau'n/P
cydberthynol/LT
troseddwyr/LT
wirebol/HM
anghyflogadwy'n/P
afforia/HP
calefyn/LT
amgrymach/HP
aflachau'n/M
porthor/LTVW
unionder/H
atglaf/HP
postliwdiau/LNT
ofynnem/M
arennillaset/P
cronnwyf/L
argaenwaith/HP
begegyr/T
awtosomau'r/P
wdenasai/MNQ
addunedau/HP
gwreiddgap/T
tindroesai/LNQ
adeiniog/HP
wirotont/M
adwedd/HP
cyhuddiadau/LNT
cydymgyfarfuasai/LNQ
agen/HP
indemneb/H
wifriad/HM
cefndedyn/LT
anweithgar/HP
clompen/LT
addef/HP
wnewch/M
Tanrhiw/LT
annioddefol/HP
pennodd/L
wahoddwr/HM
ôl-argraffiadaeth/H
difäwr/T
cydgyfarfuoch/L
troedfeinciau/LNT
wrthgytbwysau/HM
ardeleriadau'n/P
antheridiwm/HP
loc/MV
dramataiddio/NQT
cymysgaredd/LT
ysgrifenyddol/H
arfoga/ANPQ
orchymynasent/M
cymudwr/LT
paderau/LNT
arddelwau/HP
wniaduriau'n/M
dibynyddion/T
anadlwyr/HP
wrthbrofa/AMNQ
treigladaid/LT
adleoliadau/HP
datrysyn/T
yddfblatiau'n/M
alotetraploid/HP
cyd-welon/L
canolfâu/LNT
ymdafluniad/H
wargengl/HM
Trotscïad/LT
wenir/M
anhaeddol/HP
ceraist/L
oresgynnir/M
blwyddiaduron/T
ysgwydd/H
cydfwriada/ALNQ
anghydrif/HP
crôm/LT
eilwad/HM
warantiad/HM
Brynrefail/T
crafengych/L
areola'n/P
wasgfâu'r/M
gwrthrycholiadau/NT
asepsis/HP
canolbarth/LT
wiwdeb/HM
agorell/HP
berceuse/NT
oramcangyfrifon/HM
infoliwt/H
cilchwyrn/LT
certaid/LT
wallgofdy'r/M
anghaffaeladwy'n/P
ailfedyddiwr/HP
cyfludo/LNQT
pelets/LT
wasga/AMNQ
arosasai/NPQ
barmon/T
ilewm/H
wardeiniaethau'r/M
trosbennau/LNT
tremyddol/LT
amddifedid/P
oddefol/HM
anfeidroledd/HP
cyfrinfa/LNRT
blwyddiadur/T
afaelodd/M
affelion/HP
clywsant/L
archolledig/HP
priddegol/LT
wyrdroadau'n/M
wibfaen/HM
Ceidio/LT
all-ddarlleniad/HP
wympaf/HM
crasgnôi/LNQ
prologau/LNT
enfa'n/M
yndeintiad/H
anghywirdeb/HP
cnapiau/LNT
pontiog/LT
